Massachusetts, session 194th, S3235.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of 
capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of 
conservation and recreation, may enter into a 25-year lease with the town of Plymouth for the 
fields and facilities, together with the land and appurtenances of a parcel of land known as the 
Pilgrim Memorial State Park, which is located at 79 Water street, in the town of Plymouth. The 
lease may provide for improvements to the field and facilities, together with the land and 
appurtenances. 
(b) Any lease executed under this section shall be on terms, conditions and consideration 
acceptable to the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation 
with the commissioner of conservation and recreation, and may be renewed decennially for 10-
year terms at the discretion of the parties named above; provided, however, that any lease 
entered into pursuant to this section shall provide that: (i) the town of Plymouth shall provide 
general oversight for land, facilities, fields and appurtenances associated therewith during the 

of 2 14 term of the lease; (ii) the town of Plymouth shall carry comprehensive general liability insurance 
naming the commonwealth as a co-insured, to protect the commonwealth against all claims for 
personal injury or property damage arising from or on land and appurtenances associated 
therewith during the term of the lease; (iii) Pilgrim Memorial State Park shall be accessible to the 
general public when not in use by permittees; (iv) the town of Plymouth shall not design or 
construct any facilities on the parcel without the written approval of the commissioner of capital 
asset management and maintenance and the commissioner of conservation and recreation; (v) the 
town of Plymouth shall be responsible for all utility costs, subject to the lease, and for the 
general day-to-day maintenance of Pilgrim Memorial State Park; and (vi) the town of Plymouth 
shall have sole responsibility for the development of rules and the establishment of fees for the 
use of Pilgrim Memorial Park."